test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-muuz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - muuʒ â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: muuʒ
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: muvʒʒi
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: muvʒʒi
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: muvʒʒǥa
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: muvʒʒest
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Com+Indef: muvʒʒin
     muuʒ+N+Ess+Indef: muvʒʒen
     muuʒ+N+Par+Indef: muvʒʒed
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [muvʒʒitaa, muvʒʒitää]
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: muvʒʒi
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: muvʒʒji
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: muvʒʒjid
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: muvʒʒjid
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: muvʒʒjin
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Com+Indef: muvʒʒjivuiʹm
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [muvʒʒjitaa, muvʒʒjitää]
     
